Colorado, session 2026A, HB1268.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 5 to article 20 of title
29 as follows:
PART 5
SITING OF RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECTS
29-20-501. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 5, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(1) "BROWNFIELD SITE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
30-31-103 (3).
(2) "BRUNOT AGREEMENT" MEANS THE AGREEMENT OF SEPTEMBER
13, 1873, RATIFIED BY ACT OF APRIL 29, 1874, CH. 136, 18 STAT. 36 (1874).
(3) "BRUNOT AREA" MEANS THE LAND RELINQUISHED AND
CONVEYED BY THE CONFEDERATED BANDS OF THE UTE NATION TO THE
UNITED STATES IN THE BRUNOT AGREEMENT AND UPON WHICH THE UNITED
STATES AGREED TO PERMIT THE UTE INDIANS TO HUNT "SO LONG AS THE
GAME LASTS AND THE INDIANS ARE AT PEACE WITH THE WHITE PEOPLE."
(4) "CLOSED LANDFILL" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
30-20-124 (1)(c).
(5) "DEVELOPER" MEANS A PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR DEVELOPING
AN ELIGIBLE PROJECT.
(6) "ELIGIBLE PROJECT" MEANS UNDERTAKINGS AND ACTIVITIES
RELATED TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF RENEWABLE ENERGY OR ENERGY
STORAGE SYSTEM INFRASTRUCTURE, WHICH UNDERTAKINGS AND ACTIVITIES
ARE RELATED TO AN ELIGIBLE SITE AND MAY INCLUDE ACQUISITION OF LAND
AND OTHER PROPERTY; DEMOLITION AND REMOVAL OF BUILDINGS AND
IMPROVEMENTS; SITE PREPARATION, CLEANUP, AND REMEDIATION; AND
INSTALLATION OF RENEWABLE ENERGY OR ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM
INFRASTRUCTURE.
(7) "ELIGIBLE SITE" MEANS:
(a) A BROWNFIELD SITE;
(b) MINING OPERATION AFFECTED LAND AND MINING OPERATION
AFFECTED LAND FOR WHICH THE LIFE OF THE MINE HAS BEEN TERMINATED;
(c) A CLOSED LANDFILL;
(d) LAND AFFECTED BY AN OIL AND GAS OPERATION FOR WHICH ALL
OIL AND GAS INFRASTRUCTURE HAS BEEN DECOMMISSIONED AND THE SITE
IS ELIGIBLE FOR FINAL RECLAMATION, AS DETERMINED BY THE DIRECTOR OF
THE ENERGY AND CARBON MANAGEMENT COMMISSION UNDER THE "ENERGY
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1268

AND CARBON MANAGEMENT ACT", ARTICLE 60 OF TITLE 34; OR
(e) LAND THAT IS:
(I) DESIGNATED BY THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL
PROTECTION AGENCY UNDER THE FEDERAL "COMPREHENSIVE
ENVIRONMENTAL RESPONSE, COMPENSATION, AND LIABILITY ACT OF 1980",
42 U.S.C. SEC. 9601 ET SEQ.;
(II) DESIGNATED BY THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL
PROTECTION AGENCY UNDER THE CORRECTIVE ACTION PROGRAM OF THE
FEDERAL "RESOURCE CONSERVATION AND RECOVERY ACT OF 1976", 42
U.S.C. SEC. 6901 ET SEQ.; OR
(III) REGULATED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND
ENVIRONMENT UNDER THE "VOLUNTARY CLEAN-UP AND REDEVELOPMENT
ACT", PART 3 OF ARTICLE 16 OF TITLE 25.
(8) "ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 40-2-130 (2)(a).
(9) "LIFE OF THE MINE":
(a) WITH RESPECT TO A MINING OPERATION FOR THE EXTRACTION OF
MINERALS, HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 34-32-103 (6); OR
(b) WITH RESPECT TO A MINING OPERATION FOR THE EXTRACTION OF
CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS, HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
34-32.5-103 (11).
(10) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" MEANS A STATUTORY OR HOME RULE
CITY, TOWN, COUNTY, OR CITY AND COUNTY.
(11) "LOCAL PERMITTING ENTITY" MEANS THE GOVERNING BODY OF
A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR AN AGENCY OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT WITH
PERMITTING AUTHORITY OVER LAND USES.
(12) "MINING OPERATION AFFECTED LAND AND MINING OPERATION
AFFECTED LAND FOR WHICH THE LIFE OF THE MINE HAS BEEN TERMINATED":
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1268

(a) WITH RESPECT TO A MINING OPERATION FOR THE EXTRACTION OF
MINERALS, HAS THE SAME MEANING AS "AFFECTED LAND" AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 34-32-103 (1.5); OR
(b) WITH RESPECT TO A MINING OPERATION FOR THE EXTRACTION OF
CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS, HAS THE SAME MEANING AS "AFFECTED LAND"
AS DEFINED IN SECTION 34-32.5-103 (1).
(13) (a) "RENEWABLE ENERGY" MEANS USEFUL ELECTRIC, THERMAL,
OR MECHANICAL ENERGY:
(I) THAT IS:
(A) CONVERTED DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY FROM RESOURCES OF
CONTINUOUS ENERGY FLOW; OR
(B) PERPETUALLY REPLENISHED; AND
(II) THE UTILIZATION OF WHICH IS SUSTAINABLE INDEFINITELY.
(b) "RENEWABLE ENERGY" INCLUDES SOLAR, WIND, AND
GEOTHERMAL ENERGY.
(14) "RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA" MEANS ONE OR
MORE ELIGIBLE SITES THAT A LOCAL PERMITTING ENTITY DESIGNATES AS AN
APPROPRIATE LOCATION FOR THE SITING OF ELIGIBLE PROJECTS AND FOR
WHICH COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH A PROJECT MAY BE FINANCED OR
REIMBURSED THROUGH TAX INCREMENT REVENUE PURSUANT TO SECTION
30-31-109 OR 31-25-107.
(15) (a) "UTILITY" MEANS AN ELECTRIC UTILITY IN THE STATE.
(b) "UTILITY" INCLUDES:
(I) AN INVESTOR-OWNED ELECTRIC UTILITY;
(II) A COOPERATIVE ELECTRIC ASSOCIATION FORMED PURSUANT TO
ARTICLE 9.5 OF TITLE 40;
(III) A MUNICIPALLY OWNED UTILITY; AND
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1268

(IV) A WHOLESALE ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE AS DEFINED IN SECTION
40-2-136 (3)(c).
29-20-502. Renewable energy reinvestment areas - designation
by a local permitting entity - consultation with tribal governments.
(1) (a) A LOCAL PERMITTING ENTITY MAY DESIGNATE ONE OR MORE
ELIGIBLE SITES WITHIN ITS JURISDICTION AS A RENEWABLE ENERGY
REINVESTMENT AREA FOR THE SITING OF ELIGIBLE PROJECTS.
(b) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, TO
DESIGNATE ONE OR MORE ELIGIBLE SITES AS A RENEWABLE ENERGY
REINVESTMENT AREA, A LOCAL PERMITTING ENTITY MUST:
(I) COMPILE AND MAKE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE RELEVANT
DOCUMENTATION DEMONSTRATING THAT THE SITE IS AN ELIGIBLE SITE;
(II) CONSULT WITH THE DIVISION OF PARKS AND WILDLIFE CREATED
IN SECTION 33-9-104 (1) REGARDING THE WILDLIFE AND HABITAT IMPACTS
OF CONSTRUCTING ELIGIBLE PROJECTS ON THE SITE, INCLUDING IMPACTS TO
STATE AND FEDERALLY LISTED SPECIES AND SPECIES AND HABITATS OF
CONSERVATION CONCERN;
(III) (A) HOLD ONE OR MORE PUBLIC HEARINGS REGARDING THE
DESIGNATION OF THE SITE OR SITES AS A RENEWABLE ENERGY
REINVESTMENT AREA AND HOLD ONE OR MORE PUBLIC HEARINGS REGARDING
APPLICATIONS FOR ANY CONSTRUCTION PERMITS REQUIRED FOR EACH
PROPOSED ELIGIBLE PROJECT IN THE RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT
AREA; OR
(B) DESIGNATE THE ELIGIBLE SITE OR SITES AS PART OF A NEW
URBAN RENEWAL PLAN OR A SUBSTANTIAL MODIFICATION TO AN EXISTING
URBAN RENEWAL PLAN PURSUANT TO SECTION 31-25-107 OR AS PART OF A
NEW COUNTY REVITALIZATION PLAN OR A SUBSTANTIAL MODIFICATION TO
AN EXISTING COUNTY REVITALIZATION PLAN PURSUANT TO SECTION
30-31-109; AND
(IV) ENSURE THAT OUTREACH TO AND ENGAGEMENT OF
DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED COMMUNITIES REGARDING THE
DESIGNATION OF A RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA WITHIN THE
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1268

JURISDICTION OF THE LOCAL PERMITTING ENTITY INCLUDES COMMUNITY
MEETINGS THAT ARE SUBSTANTIALLY CONSISTENT WITH THE PROCESS SET
FORTH IN SECTION 24-4-109 (3) REGARDING THE DESIGNATION.
(2) A LOCAL PERMITTING ENTITY SHALL NOT DESIGNATE AN ELIGIBLE
SITE:
(a) WITHIN THE SOUTHERN UTE INDIAN TRIBE RESERVATION AS A
RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA UNLESS THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
FIRST CONSULTS WITH THE TRIBAL GOVERNMENT OF THE SOUTHERN UTE
INDIAN TRIBE; AND
(b) WITHIN THE BRUNOT AREA AS A RENEWABLE ENERGY
REINVESTMENT AREA UNLESS THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT FIRST CONSULTS
WITH THE TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS OF THE UTE MOUNTAIN UTE TRIBE AND
THE SOUTHERN UTE INDIAN TRIBE CONCERNING THE POTENTIAL IMPACTS TO
HUNTING, FISHING, AND GATHERING RIGHTS RELATED TO DESIGNATION OF
THE ELIGIBLE SITE.
29-20-503. Information for siting eligible projects in renewable
energy reinvestment areas - requests from local governments or
developers.
UPON A REQUEST BY A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR A DEVELOPER FOR
INFORMATION REGARDING THE DESIGNATED RENEWABLE ENERGY
REINVESTMENT AREA, A UTILITY SHALL ACKNOWLEDGE THE REQUEST
WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE REQUEST IS MADE AND PROVIDE THE
REQUESTOR READILY AVAILABLE INFORMATION.
29-20-504. Saving clause.
NOTHING IN THIS PART 5 SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO AUTHORIZE THE
CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION, OR EXPANSION OF AN ELIGIBLE PROJECT IN A
RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA IF THE PROJECT WOULD
OTHERWISE BE PROHIBITED OR DISALLOWED UNDER APPLICABLE FEDERAL OR
STATE ENVIRONMENTAL STATUTES, RULES, OR REGULATIONS, INCLUDING
STATUTES, RULES, OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING THE IDENTIFICATION,
ASSESSMENT, REMEDIATION, OR REUSE OF A BROWNFIELD SITE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-38.5-126 as
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1268

follows:
24-38.5-126. Development guidance for renewable energy
development in renewable energy reinvestment areas - definition.
(1) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, THE COLORADO ENERGY
OFFICE SHALL:
(a) PUBLISH ON THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE'S WEBSITE AN
OUTLINE OF THE GENERAL PROCESS FOR SITING, PERMITTING, AND
DEVELOPING RENEWABLE ENERGY PROJECTS IN RENEWABLE ENERGY
REINVESTMENT AREAS; AND
(b) CONSOLIDATE RELEVANT TECHNICAL AND INFORMATIONAL
RESOURCES FOR RENEWABLE ENERGY DEVELOPMENT IN RENEWABLE ENERGY
REINVESTMENT AREAS.
(2) THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE SHALL PERIODICALLY REVIEW
AND UPDATE THE INFORMATION PROVIDED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF
THIS SECTION ON THE OFFICE'S WEBSITE.
(3) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA" HAS THE MEANING
SET FORTH IN SECTION 29-20-501 (14).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 31-25-103, add (3.6)
and (6.3) as follows:
31-25-103. Definitions.
As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:
(3.6) "ELIGIBLE PROJECT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
29-20-501 (6).
(6.3) "RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 29-20-501 (14).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 31-25-105, amend
(1)(l); and add (1)(m) as follows:
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1268

31-25-105. Powers of an authority.
(1) Every authority has all the powers necessary or convenient to
carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this part 1,
including, but not limited to, the following powers in addition to others
granted in this part 1:
(l) To rent or to provide by any other means suitable quarters for the
use of the authority or to accept the use of such quarters as may be
furnished by the municipality or any other public body, and to equip such
quarters with such furniture, furnishings, equipment, records, and supplies
as the authority may deem necessary to enable it to exercise its powers
under this part 1; AND
(m) PURSUANT TO SECTION 31-25-107 (9)(a)(II), TO AUTHORIZE THE
DISTRIBUTION OF TAX INCREMENT REVENUE TO FINANCE COSTS NEEDED FOR
ONE OR MORE ELIGIBLE PROJECTS SITED IN A RENEWABLE ENERGY
REINVESTMENT AREA.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 31-25-107, add
(1)(c)(IV), (7.3), and (9)(j) as follows:
31-25-107. Approval of urban renewal plans by local governing
body - renewable energy reinvestment areas - definitions.
(1) (c) (IV) AN URBAN RENEWAL PLAN OR A SUBSTANTIAL
MODIFICATION TO AN EXISTING URBAN RENEWAL PLAN APPROVED PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION MUST INCLUDE:
(A) A MAP DEPICTING THE BOUNDARIES OF ANY RENEWABLE ENERGY
REINVESTMENT AREA INCLUDED IN THE URBAN RENEWAL PLAN OR
SUBSTANTIAL MODIFICATION; AND
(B) A DESCRIPTION OF THE ELIGIBLE PROJECTS AND ELIGIBLE
PROJECT COSTS TO BE FINANCED OR REIMBURSED WITH TAX INCREMENT
REVENUE WITHIN EACH RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA
INCLUDED IN THE URBAN RENEWAL PLAN OR SUBSTANTIAL MODIFICATION.
(7.3) AN URBAN RENEWAL PLAN OR A SUBSTANTIAL MODIFICATION
TO AN EXISTING URBAN RENEWAL PLAN MAY INCLUDE ONE OR MORE
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1268

ELIGIBLE PROJECTS LOCATED WITHIN A RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT
AREA REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT
AREA IS LOCATED WITHIN OR IS CONTIGUOUS TO THE BOUNDARIES OF THE
URBAN RENEWAL AREA.
(9) (j) (I) A RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA INCLUDED IN
AN URBAN RENEWAL PLAN PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEEMED
PART OF THE URBAN RENEWAL AREA FOR ALL PURPOSES SET FORTH IN THIS
PART 1.
(II) AN URBAN RENEWAL AUTHORITY MAY USE TAX INCREMENT
REVENUE GENERATED FROM ANY PORTION OF THE URBAN RENEWAL AREA
APPROVED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO FINANCE OR REIMBURSE COSTS
INCURRED TO CARRY OUT ELIGIBLE PROJECTS WITHIN THE URBAN RENEWAL
AREA, INCLUDING WITHIN A RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA
INCLUDED IN THE URBAN RENEWAL AREA.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-31-103, add (9.5)
and (13.5) as follows:
30-31-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 31, unless the context otherwise requires:
(9.5) "ELIGIBLE PROJECT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
29-20-501 (6).
(13.5) "RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 29-20-501 (14).
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-31-105, add (5) as
follows:
30-31-105. Powers of an authority.
(5) PURSUANT TO SECTION 30-31-109 (13)(a)(II), AN AUTHORITY
MAY DISTRIBUTE TAX INCREMENT REVENUE TO FINANCE COSTS INCURRED TO
CARRY OUT ONE OR MORE ELIGIBLE PROJECTS SITED IN A RENEWABLE
ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1268

SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-31-109, amend
(1)(d); and add (1)(c)(IV) and (13)(j) as follows:
30-31-109. Approval of county revitalization plans by local
governing body - renewable energy reinvestment areas - definitions.
(1) (c) (IV) A COUNTY REVITALIZATION PLAN OR A SUBSTANTIAL
MODIFICATION TO AN EXISTING COUNTY REVITALIZATION PLAN MAY
INCLUDE ONE OR MORE ELIGIBLE PROJECTS LOCATED WITHIN A RENEWABLE
ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE RENEWABLE
ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA IS LOCATED WITHIN OR IS CONTIGUOUS TO THE
BOUNDARIES OF THE COUNTY REVITALIZATION AREA.
(d) (I) A county revitalization plan that is approved or substantially
modified must include a legal description of the county revitalization area,
including the legal description of any agricultural land proposed for
inclusion within the county revitalization area pursuant to subsection
(1)(c)(II) of this section.
(II) A COUNTY REVITALIZATION PLAN OR A SUBSTANTIAL
MODIFICATION TO AN EXISTING COUNTY REVITALIZATION PLAN APPROVED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MUST INCLUDE:
(A) A MAP DEPICTING THE BOUNDARIES OF ANY RENEWABLE ENERGY
REINVESTMENT AREA INCLUDED IN THE COUNTY REVITALIZATION PLAN OR
SUBSTANTIAL MODIFICATION; AND
(B) A DESCRIPTION OF THE ELIGIBLE PROJECTS AND ELIGIBLE
PROJECT COSTS TO BE FINANCED OR REIMBURSED WITH TAX INCREMENT
REVENUE WITHIN EACH RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA
INCLUDED IN THE COUNTY REVITALIZATION PLAN OR SUBSTANTIAL
MODIFICATION.
(13) (j) (I) A RENEWABLE ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA INCLUDED
IN A COUNTY REVITALIZATION PLAN PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION SHALL BE
DEEMED PART OF THE COUNTY REVITALIZATION AREA FOR ALL PURPOSES SET
FORTH IN THIS ARTICLE 31.
(II) A COUNTY REVITALIZATION AUTHORITY MAY USE TAX
INCREMENT REVENUE GENERATED FROM ANY PORTION OF THE COUNTY
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1268

REVITALIZATION AREA APPROVED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO FINANCE
OR REIMBURSE COSTS INCURRED TO CARRY OUT ELIGIBLE PROJECTS WITHIN
THE COUNTY REVITALIZATION AREA, INCLUDING WITHIN A RENEWABLE
ENERGY REINVESTMENT AREA INCLUDED IN THE COUNTY REVITALIZATION
AREA.
SECTION 9. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1268

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1268